Illinois, session 104th, SB1432.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-74.4-7 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-7)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-7)7    Sec. 11-74.4-7. Obligations secured by the special tax 8allocation fund set forth in Section 11-74.4-8 for the 9redevelopment project area may be issued to provide for 10redevelopment project costs. Such obligations, when so issued, 11shall be retired in the manner provided in the ordinance 12authorizing the issuance of such obligations by the receipts 13of taxes levied as specified in Section 11-74.4-9 against the 14taxable property included in the area, by revenues as 15specified by Section 11-74.4-8a and other revenue designated 16by the municipality. A municipality may in the ordinance 17pledge all or any part of the funds in and to be deposited in 18the special tax allocation fund created pursuant to Section 1911-74.4-8 to the payment of the redevelopment project costs 20and obligations. Any pledge of funds in the special tax 21allocation fund shall provide for distribution to the taxing 22districts and to the Illinois Department of Revenue of moneys 23not required, pledged, earmarked, or otherwise designated for   SB1432- 2 -LRB104 08034 RTM 18080 b1payment and securing of the obligations and anticipated 2redevelopment project costs and such excess funds shall be 3calculated annually and deemed to be "surplus" funds. In the 4event a municipality only applies or pledges a portion of the 5funds in the special tax allocation fund for the payment or 6securing of anticipated redevelopment project costs or of 7obligations, any such funds remaining in the special tax 8allocation fund after complying with the requirements of the 9application or pledge, shall also be calculated annually and 10deemed "surplus" funds. All surplus funds in the special tax 11allocation fund shall be distributed as soon as possible after 12they are calculated under this Section annually within 180 13days after the close of the municipality's fiscal year by 14being paid by the municipal treasurer to the County Collector, 15to the Department of Revenue and to the municipality in direct 16proportion to the tax incremental revenue received as a result 17of an increase in the equalized assessed value of property in 18the redevelopment project area, tax incremental revenue 19received from the State and tax incremental revenue received 20from the municipality, but not to exceed as to each such source 21the total incremental revenue received from that source. The 22County Collector shall thereafter make distribution to the 23respective taxing districts in the same manner and proportion 24as the most recent distribution by the county collector to the 25affected districts of real property taxes from real property 26in the redevelopment project area.  SB1432- 3 -LRB104 08034 RTM 18080 b1    Without limiting the foregoing in this Section, the 2municipality may in addition to obligations secured by the 3special tax allocation fund pledge for a period not greater 4than the term of the obligations towards payment of such 5obligations any part or any combination of the following: (a) 6net revenues of all or part of any redevelopment project; (b) 7taxes levied and collected on any or all property in the 8municipality; (c) the full faith and credit of the 9municipality; (d) a mortgage on part or all of the 10redevelopment project; (d-5) repayment of bonds issued 11pursuant to subsection (p-130) of Section 19-1 of the School 12Code; or (e) any other taxes or anticipated receipts that the 13municipality may lawfully pledge.14    Such obligations may be issued in one or more series 15bearing interest at such rate or rates as the corporate 16authorities of the municipality shall determine by ordinance. 17Such obligations shall bear such date or dates, mature at such 18time or times not exceeding 20 years from their respective 19dates, be in such denomination, carry such registration 20privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such 21medium of payment at such place or places, contain such 22covenants, terms and conditions, and be subject to redemption 23as such ordinance shall provide. Obligations issued pursuant 24to this Act may be sold at public or private sale at such price 25as shall be determined by the corporate authorities of the 26municipalities. No referendum approval of the electors shall   SB1432- 4 -LRB104 08034 RTM 18080 b1be required as a condition to the issuance of obligations 2pursuant to this Division except as provided in this Section.3    In the event the municipality authorizes issuance of 4obligations pursuant to the authority of this Division secured 5by the full faith and credit of the municipality, which 6obligations are other than obligations which may be issued 7under home rule powers provided by Article VII, Section 6 of 8the Illinois Constitution, or pledges taxes pursuant to (b) or 9(c) of the second paragraph of this section, the ordinance 10authorizing the issuance of such obligations or pledging such 11taxes shall be published within 10 days after such ordinance 12has been passed in one or more newspapers, with general 13circulation within such municipality. The publication of the 14ordinance shall be accompanied by a notice of (1) the specific 15number of voters required to sign a petition requesting the 16question of the issuance of such obligations or pledging taxes 17to be submitted to the electors; (2) the time in which such 18petition must be filed; and (3) the date of the prospective 19referendum. The municipal clerk shall provide a petition form 20to any individual requesting one.21    If no petition is filed with the municipal clerk, as 22hereinafter provided in this Section, within 30 days after the 23publication of the ordinance, the ordinance shall be in 24effect. But, if within that 30 day period a petition is filed 25with the municipal clerk, signed by electors in the 26municipality numbering 10% or more of the number of registered   SB1432- 5 -LRB104 08034 RTM 18080 b1voters in the municipality, asking that the question of 2issuing obligations using full faith and credit of the 3municipality as security for the cost of paying for 4redevelopment project costs, or of pledging taxes for the 5payment of such obligations, or both, be submitted to the 6electors of the municipality, the corporate authorities of the 7municipality shall call a special election in the manner 8provided by law to vote upon that question, or, if a general, 9State or municipal election is to be held within a period of 10not less than 30 or more than 90 days from the date such 11petition is filed, shall submit the question at the next 12general, State or municipal election. If it appears upon the 13canvass of the election by the corporate authorities that a 14majority of electors voting upon the question voted in favor 15thereof, the ordinance shall be in effect, but if a majority of 16the electors voting upon the question are not in favor 17thereof, the ordinance shall not take effect.18    The ordinance authorizing the obligations may provide that 19the obligations shall contain a recital that they are issued 20pursuant to this Division, which recital shall be conclusive 21evidence of their validity and of the regularity of their 22issuance.23    In the event the municipality authorizes issuance of 24obligations pursuant to this Section secured by the full faith 25and credit of the municipality, the ordinance authorizing the 26obligations may provide for the levy and collection of a   SB1432- 6 -LRB104 08034 RTM 18080 b1direct annual tax upon all taxable property within the 2municipality sufficient to pay the principal thereof and 3interest thereon as it matures, which levy may be in addition 4to and exclusive of the maximum of all other taxes authorized 5to be levied by the municipality, which levy, however, shall 6be abated to the extent that monies from other sources are 7available for payment of the obligations and the municipality 8certifies the amount of said monies available to the county 9clerk.10    A certified copy of such ordinance shall be filed with the 11county clerk of each county in which any portion of the 12municipality is situated, and shall constitute the authority 13for the extension and collection of the taxes to be deposited 14in the special tax allocation fund.15    A municipality may also issue its obligations to refund in 16whole or in part, obligations theretofore issued by such 17municipality under the authority of this Act, whether at or 18prior to maturity, provided however, that the last maturity of 19the refunding obligations may not be later than the dates set 20forth under Section 11-74.4-3.5.21    In the event a municipality issues obligations under home 22rule powers or other legislative authority the proceeds of 23which are pledged to pay for redevelopment project costs, the 24municipality may, if it has followed the procedures in 25conformance with this division, retire said obligations from 26funds in the special tax allocation fund in amounts and in such   SB1432- 7 -LRB104 08034 RTM 18080 b1manner as if such obligations had been issued pursuant to the 2provisions of this division.3    All obligations heretofore or hereafter issued pursuant to 4this Act shall not be regarded as indebtedness of the 5municipality issuing such obligations or any other taxing 6district for the purpose of any limitation imposed by law.7(Source: P.A. 100-531, eff. 9-22-17.)